bhojpuri.dix
    <pardef n="/तू__pro_self">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आप</l>
          <r>तू<s n="pn" /><s n="hon" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आपके</l>
          <r>तू<s n="pn" /><s n="hon" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आपसे</l>
          <r>तू<s n="pn" /><s n="hon" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आपमें</l>
          <r>तू<s n="pn" /><s n="hon" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आपपर</l>
          <r>तू<s n="pn" /><s n="hon" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सब/__pro_o_a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आपन/__pro_o_u">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="तू/__pro_d_m_e">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="तू/__pro_d_m_e1">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हम/__pro_d_u_e">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नै</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हम/__pro_d_u_e1">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हनो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="तू/__pro_m_e">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरै</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरैके</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरैसे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरैमें</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरैपर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हनइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहकइके</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहकइसे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहकइमें</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहकइपर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="तू/__pro_m_e1">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरोके</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरोसे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरोमें</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरोप</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहनो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहनोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहनोZथ्ण्झ्से</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहनोZथ्ण्झ्में</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहनोZथ्ण्झ्प</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खा/__root">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="खा">
      <i>खा</i>
      <par n="खा/__root" />
    </e>
    <e lm="तू">
      <i>तू</i>
      <par n="तू/__pro_m_e1" />
    </e>
    <e lm="तू">
      <i>तू</i>
      <par n="तू/__pro_m_e" />
    </e>
    <e lm="हम">
      <i>हम</i>
      <par n="हम/__pro_d_u_e1" />
    </e>
    <e lm="हम">
      <i>हम</i>
      <par n="हम/__pro_d_u_e" />
    </e>
    <e lm="तू">
      <i>तू</i>
      <par n="तू/__pro_d_m_e1" />
    </e>
    <e lm="तू">
      <i>तू</i>
      <par n="तू/__pro_d_m_e" />
    </e>
    <e lm="आपन">
      <i>आपन</i>
      <par n="आपन/__pro_o_u" />
    </e>
    <e lm="सब">
      <i>सब</i>
      <par n="सब/__pro_o_a" />
    </e>
    <e lm="">
      <i />
      <par n="/तू__pro_self" />
    </e>
